Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.190

Board of trustees—Authority to accept gifts and bequests.

The board of trustees may accept property by gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise for the use of such institution, except that acceptance of any interest in real property shall be by prior authorization by the county.

[ 1984 c 26 s 16; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.190. Prior: (i) 1945 c 118 s 1, part; 1931 c 139 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 6090-15, part. (ii) 1931 c 139 s 8; RRS s 6090-16.]